Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 27.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2727
Equity purchase contract and related documents and instruments; English required; translation into other language.

Any equity purchase contract, rental agreement, lease, or option or right to repurchase and any notice, conveyance, lien, encumbrance, consent, or other document or instrument signed by a homeowner shall be written in English and shall be accompanied by a written translation from English into any other language principally spoken by the homeowner, certified by the person making the translation as a true and correct translation of the English version. The translated version shall be presumed to have equal status and credibility as the English version.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 27.
July 18, 2008